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LANDCRUISER(W/G) (RM6 16E)

DTC C 1789 / 89 L4 Position Switch Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
This circuit is sending the signal to the ECU by detecting that the transfer shift lever is in ”L4” position.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

C1789 /89 L4positionswitchsignaldoesnotchange.
SL4positionswitch
SL4positionswitchcircuit
SSuspensioncontrolECU
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 CheckoutputsignalofL4positionswitch.

INCASEOFUSINGHAND −HELDTESTER:
PREPARATION:
(a)Connect thehand −held tester to theDLC3.
(b)Turn the ignitionswitchONandpush thehand −held testermainswitchON.
(c)Select theDATALISTmodeon thehand −held tester.
CHECK:
Check theL4positionswitchconditiondisplayedon thehand −held testerwhenshifting the transfershift
lever in ”L4” and ”H4” positions.
OK:

When the transfer shift lever is shifted in ”L4” position:
”ON” is displayed for L4 position switch condition.
When the transfer shift lever is shifted in ”H4” position:
”OFF” is displayed for L4 position switch condition.

INCASEOFNOTUSINGHAND −HELDTESTER:
PREPARATION:
Remove the suspension control ECU with connectors still con-
nected.
CHECK:
(a) Turn the ignition switch ON.
(b) Measure voltage between terminal L4SW of suspension

control ECU connector and body ground when transfer
shift lever isshifted in ”L4”and ”H4”position.

OK:

Transfer shift lever position Voltage

L4 Below 1.5V

H4 9 − 14 V

OK No problem.
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2 Check L4 position switch.

PREPARATION:
(a) Disconnect the L4 position switch connector.
(b) Remove the L4 position switch (See page TR−9) .
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminals 1 and 2 of L4 position
switch connector when the L4 position switch pushed and re-
leased.
OK:

Switch condition Resistance

Pushed 0 � (Continuity)

Released � � (Open)

NG Replace L4 position switch.

OK

3 Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between L4 position
switch and suspension control ECU (See page IN−35).

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

Check and replace suspension control ECU.


